el: Εξαρτήματα κιτ ξυρίσματος: Βούρτσα; Ξυράφι; Κατακόρυφη; Άλλο
pt-BR: Componentes do kit de barbear: Pincel; Navalha; Suporte; Outro
en: Shaving kit components: Brush; Razor; Stand; Other
sv: Delar i rakningssats: Borste; Rakapparat; Stativ; Övrigt
ja: シェービングキットの内容物: ブラシ; かみそり; スタンド; その他
nb: Komponenter i barbersett: Børste; Barberhøvel; Stativ; Annet
de: Bestandteile des Rasiersets: Bürste; Rasierer; Ständer; Sonstiges
tr: Tıraş seti bileşenleri: Fırça; Jilet; Stant; Diğer
ro-RO: Componentele trusei de bărbierit: Perie; Brici; Suport; Altele
sl-SI: Sestavni deli kompleta za britje: Čopič; Britvica; Stojalo; Drugo
cs: Součásti sady na holení: Štětec; Břitva; Stojan; Jiné
hu: Borotvakészlet elemei: Ecset; Borotva; Állvány; Egyéb
it: Componenti del kit da barba: Pennello; Rasoio; Supporto; Altro
zh-CN: 剃须套装组件: 刷子; 剃刀; 支架; 其他
vi: Cấu tạo bộ dụng cụ cạo râu: Cọ; Dao cạo; Giá đỡ; Khác
sk-SK: Komponenty súpravy na holenie: Štetec; Žiletka; Stojan; Iné
ko: 면도 키트 구성품: 브러시; 면도칼; 스탠드; 기타
fi: Pakkauksen komponentit: Sivellin; Partaveitsi; Jalusta; Muu
es: Componentes del kit de afeitado: Pincel; Maquinilla de afeitar; Soporte; Otros
zh-TW: 刮鬍組套件零組件: 畫筆; 雷射; 立架; 其他
hr-HR: Komponente kompleta za brijanje: Četka; Britvica; Stalak; Ostalo
th: ส่วนประกอบชุดโกนหนวด: แปรง; ใบมีด; ที่ตั้ง; อื่นๆ
fr: Composants du kit de rasage: Brosse; Rasoir; Support; Autre
da: Komponenter til barbersæt: Børste; Barberblad; Stativ; Andet
bg-BG: Компоненти на комплекта за бръснене: Четка; Самобръсначка; Стойка; Други
pt-PT: Componentes do kit de barbear: Pincel; Lâmina; Suporte; Outro
pl: Elementy zestawu do golenia: Pędzel; Golarka; Statyw; Inne
nl: Componenten scheerset: Borstel; Scheermes; Standaard; Andere
lt-LT: Skutimosi priemonių komplekto komponentai: Šepetėlis; Skustuvas; Su stovu; Kita
ru: Компоненты набора для бритья: Кисть; Бритва; На подставке; Другое